Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-104
City council; powers; bridges; construction; licensing and regulation of toll bridges; jurisdiction.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class shall have power to construct any bridge declared by ordinance necessary and proper for the passage of railway trains, street cars, motor vehicles, and pedestrians across any stream either adjacent to or wholly within the city at any point on such stream or within two miles from the corporate limits of the city, with such conditions and regulations concerning the use of such bridge as may be deemed proper. The city council shall have the power to license and regulate the keeping of toll bridges within or terminating within the city for the passage of persons and property over any river passing wholly or in part within or running by and adjoining the corporate limits of the city; to fix and determine the rates of toll over any such bridge, or over the part of such bridge within the city; and to authorize the owner or owners of any such bridge to charge and collect the rates of toll so fixed and determined, from all persons passing over or using such bridge.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 4, p. 407;

C.S.1922, § 3491;

C.S.1929, § 14-104;

R.S.1943, § 14-104;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 13.
July 21, 2022